Washington statutes.
RCW 26.09.430

Notice requirement.

Except as provided in RCW 26.09.460, a person with whom the child resides a majority of the time, or a person with substantially equal residential time, shall notify every other person entitled to residential time or visitation with the child under a court order if the person intends to relocate. Notice shall be given as prescribed in RCW 26.09.440 and 26.09.450.

[ 2019 c 79 s 2; 2000 c 21 s 5.]

NOTES:

Intent—Captions not law—2000 c 21: See notes following RCW 26.09.405.